Utah statutes.
75-5-313.   Proceedings subsequent to appointment -- Venue.
(1) The court where the ward resides has concurrent jurisdiction with the
court which appointed the guardian or in which acceptance of an appointment by
will or written instrument was filed over resignation, removal, accounting,
and other proceedings relating to the guardianship.
(2)  If the court located where the ward resides is not the court in which
acceptance of appointment is filed, the court in which proceedings subsequent
to appointment are commenced shall in all appropriate cases notify the other
court, in this or another state, and after consultation with that court
determine whether to retain jurisdiction or transfer the proceedings to the
other court, whichever may be in the best interest of the ward.  A copy of any
order accepting a resignation or removing a guardian shall be sent to the
court in which acceptance of appointment is filed.
